District of Columbia statutes.
1-623.17

Time of accrual of right.

(a)

An employee is not entitled to compensation or continuation of pay as provided in § 1-623.18 for the first 3 days of temporary disability which would have otherwise been workdays for the employee, except:

(1)

When the disability exceeds 14 calendar days;

(2)

When the disability is followed by permanent disability; or

(3)

As provided by §§ 1-623.03 and 1-623.04.

(b)

An employee may use annual or sick leave to his or her credit at the time the disability begins but the time period specified in subsection (a) of this section does not begin to run until the use of annual or sick leave ends.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2317, 25 DCR 5740
Aug. 7, 1980, D.C. Law 3-81, § 2(v), 27 DCR 2632
1981 Ed., § 1-624.17.
1973 Ed., § 1-353.17.